Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-301
State Assistance Fund; created; investment.

A fund to be known as the State Assistance Fund is created and established in the treasury of the State of Nebraska. Such fund shall consist of all money appropriated to it by the Legislature, allocated by the government of the United States, or donated or allocated from other sources. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 20, § 1, p. 134;

Laws 1937, c. 188, § 1, p. 747;

Laws 1939, c. 121, § 1, p. 509;

Laws 1941, c. 174, § 1, p. 682;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-317;

R.S.1943, § 68-301;

Laws 1947, c. 144, § 15, p. 400;

Laws 1959, c. 311, § 1, p. 1151;

Laws 1965, c. 399, § 1, p. 1280;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 63, p. 2384;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 65.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

This section provided for allocation of certain taxes and funds to the State Assistance Fund, and was not intended as a continuing appropriation. Rein v. Johnson, 149 Neb. 67, 30 N.W.2d 548 (1947).